Arkansas, session 2025, HB1840.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-2703(6), concerning the definition of
"direct service provider" within the Medicaid Provider-Led Organized Care
Act, is amended to read as follows:
(6) “Direct service provider” means an organization or
individual that delivers healthcare services, including sedation dentistry,
to enrollable Medicaid beneficiary populations;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-77-2703, concerning definitions within
the Medicaid Provider-Led Organized Care Act, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(15) "Sedation dentistry" means the administration of sedative
medications during dental procedures to address routine and complex dental
care needs, including minimal sedation, moderate sedation, deep sedation, and
general anesthesia.
*JMB547*
04-03-2025 16:26:58 JMB547

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1840

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-77-2705(b), concerning the excluded
services under the Medicaid Provider-Led Organized Care Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) The Medicaid provider-led organized care system shall be
implemented to the extent possible, but shall not include the following
services when provided to enrollable Medicaid beneficiary populations:
(1) Nonemergency medical transportation in a capitated program;
(2) Dental benefits in a capitated program, not including
sedation dentistry;
(3) School-based services provided by school employees;
(4) Skilled nursing facility services;
(5) Assisted living facility services;
(6) Human development center services; or
(7) Waiver services provided to adults with physical
disabilities through the ARChoices in Homecare program or the Arkansas
IndependentChoices program.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 20-77-2706(f)(3), concerning the
characteristics and duties of a risk-based provider organization under the
Medicaid Provider-Led Organized Care Act, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) Process claims, including medical claims and dental
claims for sedation dentistry, or otherwise ensure payment to direct service
providers within time frames established under federal regulations for goods
and services delivered to the enrollable Medicaid beneficiary populations.
(B) Services provided by a risk-based provider
organization shall include medical and dental coverage for sedation dentistry
services;

/s/L. Johnson






04-03-2025 16:26:58 JMB547